Maryland, session 2026, HB0457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 20. MISCELLANEOUS PROGRAMS FOR INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION.
11–2001.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “MENSTRUAL HYGIENE PRODUCTS” MEANS
SIZE–APPROPRIATE TAMPONS OR SANITARY NAPKINS FOR USE IN CONNECTION
WITH THE MENSTRUAL CYCLE.
11–2002.
ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2028, EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
THAT PROVIDES ON–CAMPUS HOUSING SHALL PROVIDE, FREE OF CHARGE,
MENSTRUAL HYGIENE PRODUCTS IN ALL RESTROOMS STUDENT HEALTH CENTERS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 1 –